Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
SUBPART 3
JUDICIAL DISSOLUTION

7-56-714. Grounds for judicial dissolution.

A cooperative may be dissolved in a proceeding brought in court by the attorney general if it is established that:

The cooperative obtained its organization through fraud; or

The cooperative has exceeded or abused the authority conferred upon it by law.

A cooperative may be dissolved in a proceeding brought in court by not less than ten percent of the total number of members if it is established that:

The directors are deadlocked in the management of the cooperative's affairs, the members are unable to break the deadlock, and irreparable injury to the cooperative is threatened or suffered, or the business and affairs of the cooperative can no longer be conducted to the advantage of the members generally;

The directors or those in control of the cooperative have acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is illegal, oppressive, or fraudulent; or

The members are deadlocked in voting power and have failed for a period that includes at least two consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon the election of their successors.

A cooperative may be dissolved in a proceeding brought in court by a creditor if it is established that:

A creditor's claim has been reduced to judgment, the execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied, and the cooperative is insolvent; or

The cooperative is insolvent and the cooperative has admitted in writing that a creditor's claim is due and owing.

If a cooperative has been dissolved by voluntary action taken under sections 7-56-701 to 7-56-705:

The cooperative may bring a proceeding in court to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs under judicial supervision in accordance with section 7-56-716; or

The attorney general, a member, or a creditor, as the case may be, may bring a proceeding in court to wind up and liquidate the business and affairs of the cooperative under judicial supervision in accordance with section 7-56-716, upon establishing the grounds set forth for such person, respectively, in subsections (1) to (3) of this section.

As used in sections 7-56-715 to 7-56-717, a "proceeding to dissolve the cooperative" includes a proceeding brought under this subsection (4), and a "decree of dissolution" includes an order of court entered in a proceeding under this subsection (4) that directs that the business and affairs of a cooperative be wound up and liquidated under judicial supervision.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 531, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(4)(a) amended, p. 2234, § 106, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(4)(b) amended, p. 1420, § 64, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

IP(4)(a) amended, p. 1218, § 27, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

IP(4)(a) amended, p. 849, § 6, effective July 1.

7-56-715. Procedure for judicial dissolution.

A proceeding to dissolve a cooperative brought by the attorney general shall be brought in the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the cooperative's principal office is located or, if the cooperative has no principal office in this state, in the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the cooperative has no registered agent, in the district court for the city and county of Denver. A proceeding brought by any other party named in section 7-56-714 shall be brought in the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the cooperative's principal office is located or, if the cooperative has no principal office in this state, in the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the cooperative has no registered agent, in the district court for the city and county of Denver.

A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a cooperative may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the cooperative's assets, wherever located, and carry on the business of the cooperative until a full hearing can be held.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 532, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2234, § 107, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1421, § 65, effective July 1.

7-56-716. Receivership or custodianship.

A court in a proceeding to dissolve a cooperative may appoint one or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one or more custodians to manage the business and affairs, of the cooperative. The court shall hold a hearing, after giving notice to all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a receiver or custodian pursuant to this section. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has exclusive jurisdiction over the cooperative and all of its property, wherever located.

The court may appoint an individual, a domestic entity, or a foreign entity or other entity authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state as a receiver or custodian. The court may require the receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Among other powers:

The receiver may:

Dispose of all or any part of the property of the cooperative, wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; and

Sue and defend in the receiver's own name as receiver of the cooperative in all courts; or

The custodian may exercise all of the powers of the cooperative, through or in place of its board or officers, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the cooperative in the best interests of its members and creditors.

The court, during a receivership, may redesignate the receiver as custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian as receiver if doing so is in the best interests of the cooperative and its members and creditors.

The court from time to time during the receivership or custodianship may order compensation paid and expense disbursements or reimbursements made to the receiver or custodian and such person's counsel from the assets of the cooperative or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 533, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 2235, § 108, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1421, § 66, effective July 1.

7-56-717. Decree of dissolution.

If after a hearing the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in section 7-56-714 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the cooperative and stating the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the secretary of state, who shall file it pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title.

After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the cooperative's business and activities in accordance with section 7-56-705 or 7-56-716 and the giving of notice to the cooperative's registered agent, or to the secretary of state if it has no registered agent, and to claimants in accordance with sections 7-90-911 and 7-90-912.

The assets of the dissolved cooperative, after payment of administrative expenses, shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of section 7-56-705.

The court's order or decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 533, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1820, § 32, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1684, § 30, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 2235, § 109, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 849, § 7, effective July 1.